Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1432
Loan, defined.

Loan shall mean a transfer of money, property, or anything of ascertainable monetary value in exchange for an obligation, conditional or not, to repay in whole or part.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 32.